Utah statutes.
10-2-126.   Incorporation of town -- Public hearing on feasibility.

(1)  If, in accordance with Section 10-2-125, the county clerk certifies a petition for incorporation or an amended petition for incorporation, the county legislative body shall, at its next regular meeting after completion of the feasibility study, schedule a public hearing to:

(a)  be held no later than 60 days after the day on which the feasibility study is completed; and

(b)  consider, in accordance with Subsection (3)(b), the feasibility of incorporation for the proposed town.

(2)  The county legislative body shall give notice of the public hearing on the proposed incorporation by:

(a)  posting notice of the public hearing on the county's Internet website, if the county has an Internet website;

(b) (i)  publishing notice of the public hearing at least once a week for two consecutive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation within the proposed town; or

(ii)  if there is no newspaper of general circulation within the proposed town, posting notice of the public hearing in at least five conspicuous public places within the proposed town; and

(c)  publishing notice of the public hearing on the Utah Public Notice Website created in Section 63F-1-701.

(3)  At the public hearing scheduled in accordance with Subsection (1), the county legislative body shall:

(a) (i)  provide a copy of the feasibility study; and

(ii)  present the results of the feasibility study to the public; and

(b)  allow the public to:

(i)  review the map or plat of the boundary of the proposed town;

(ii)  ask questions and become informed about the proposed incorporation; and

(iii)  express its views about the proposed incorporation, including their views about the boundary of the area proposed to be incorporated.

(4)  A county may not hold an election on the incorporation of a town in accordance with Section 10-2-127 if the results of the feasibility study show that the five-year projected revenues under Subsection 10-2-125(7)(b)(v) exceed the five-year projected costs under Subsection (7)(b)(iv) by more than 10%.

